Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6271.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 282. (1) For tax years beginning on and after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer may claim a credit equal to the sum of costs paid during the tax year for all local building permits attributable to the construction of a new single-family residential dwelling but not to exceed $2,500.00 per tax year. The department may require reasonable proof from the taxpayer in support of the building permit expenses claimed under this section. (2) If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability must be refunded.